src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-eekva_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# Author: Csilla HORVATH (20230502)

# todo: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - э̄ква: # "(eng) old woman, wife/(hun) öregasszony, feleség/(rus) старуха, жена" - full paradigm

     э̄ква+N+Sg+Nom: э̄ква
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Loc: э̄кват
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Lat: э̄кван
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Abl: э̄кваныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Ins: э̄квал
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Tra: э̄кваг

     э̄ква+N+Du+Nom: э̄кваг
     э̄ква+N+Du+Loc: э̄квагт
     э̄ква+N+Du+Lat: э̄квагн
     э̄ква+N+Du+Abl: э̄квагныл
     э̄ква+N+Du+Ins: э̄квагтыл

     э̄ква+N+Pl+Nom: э̄кват
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Loc: э̄кватт
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Lat: э̄кватн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Abl: э̄кватныл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Ins: э̄кватыл

     э̄ква+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: э̄квам
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: э̄квамт
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: э̄квамн
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: э̄квамныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: э̄квамтыл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg1: э̄квамыг

     э̄ква+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: э̄квагум
     э̄ква+N+Du+Loc+PxSg1: э̄квагумт
     э̄ква+N+Du+Lat+PxSg1: э̄квагумн
     э̄ква+N+Du+Abl+PxSg1: э̄квагумныл
     э̄ква+N+Du+Ins+PxSg1: э̄квагумтыл

     э̄ква+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: э̄кванум
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: э̄кванумт
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: э̄кванумн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: э̄кванумныл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: э̄кванумтыл

     э̄ква+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: э̄кван
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: э̄квант
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg2: э̄кванн
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: э̄кванныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: э̄квантыл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg2: э̄кваныг

     э̄ква+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [э̄квагын, э̄квагн]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Loc+PxSg2: э̄квагынт
     э̄ква+N+Du+Lat+PxSg2: э̄квагынн
     э̄ква+N+Du+Abl+PxSg2: э̄квагынныл
     э̄ква+N+Du+Ins+PxSg2: э̄квагынтыл

     э̄ква+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [э̄кванын, э̄кван]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [э̄кванынт, э̄квант]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg2: [э̄кванынн, э̄кванн]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [э̄кванынныл, э̄кванныл]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: [э̄кванынтыл, э̄квантыл]

     э̄ква+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: э̄кватэ
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [э̄кватэ̄т, э̄кватэт]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg3: [э̄кватэ̄н, э̄кватэн]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [э̄кватэ̄ныл, э̄кватэныл]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: [э̄кватэ̄нтыл, э̄кватэнтыл]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg3: [э̄кватэ̄г, э̄кватэг]

     э̄ква+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: э̄кваге
     э̄ква+N+Du+Loc+PxSg3: [э̄кваге̄т, э̄квагет]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Lat+PxSg3: [э̄кваге̄н, э̄кваген]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Abl+PxSg3: [э̄кваге̄ныл, э̄квагеныл]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Ins+PxSg3: [э̄кваге̄тыл, э̄квагетыл]

     э̄ква+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: э̄кванэ
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [э̄кванэ̄т, э̄кванэт]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg3: [э̄кванэ̄н, э̄кванэн]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [э̄кванэ̄ныл, э̄кванэныл]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: [э̄кванэ̄тыл, э̄кванэтыл]

     э̄ква+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: [э̄кваме̄н, э̄квамен]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [э̄кваме̄нт, э̄квамент]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu1: [э̄кваме̄нн, э̄кваменн]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [э̄кваме̄нныл, э̄кваменныл]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu1: [э̄кваме̄нтыл, э̄кваментыл]

     э̄ква+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [э̄квагаме̄н, э̄квагамен, э̄квагмен]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Loc+PxDu1: [э̄квагаме̄нт, э̄квагамент, э̄квагмент]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Lat+PxDu1: [э̄квагаме̄нн, э̄квагаменн, э̄квагменн]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Abl+PxDu1: [э̄квагаме̄нныл, э̄квагаменныл, э̄квагменныл]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Ins+PxDu1: [э̄квагаме̄нтыл, э̄квагаментыл, э̄квагментыл]

     э̄ква+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: [э̄кванаме̄н, э̄кванамен]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [э̄кванаме̄нт, э̄кванамент]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu1: [э̄кванаме̄нн, э̄кванаменн]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [э̄кванаме̄нныл, э̄кванаменныл]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu1: [э̄кванаме̄нтыл, э̄кванаментыл]

     э̄ква+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: [э̄кван, э̄ква̄н]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [э̄квант, э̄ква̄нт]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu2: [э̄кванн, э̄ква̄нн]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [э̄кванныл, э̄ква̄нныл]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu2: [э̄квантыл, э̄ква̄нтыл]

     э̄ква+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [э̄квагын, э̄квагы̄н]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Loc+PxDu2: [э̄квагынт, э̄квагы̄нт]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Lat+PxDu2: [э̄квагынн, э̄квагы̄нн]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Abl+PxDu2: [э̄квагынныл, э̄квагы̄нныл] 
     э̄ква+N+Du+Ins+PxDu2: [э̄квагынтыл, э̄квагы̄нтыл]

     э̄ква+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: [э̄кванын, э̄кваны̄н, э̄кван]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [э̄кванынт, э̄кваны̄нт, э̄квант]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu2: [э̄кванынн, э̄кваны̄нн, э̄кванн]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [э̄кванынныл, э̄кваны̄нныл, э̄кванныл]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu2: [э̄кванынтыл, э̄кваны̄нтыл, э̄квантыл]

     э̄ква+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: [э̄кватэ̄н, э̄кватэн]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [э̄кватэ̄нт, э̄кватэнт]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu3: [э̄кватэ̄нн, э̄кватэнн]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [э̄кватэ̄нныл, э̄кватэнныл]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu3: [э̄кватэ̄нтыл, э̄кватэнтыл]

     э̄ква+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [э̄кваге̄н, э̄кваген]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Loc+PxDu3: [э̄кваге̄нт, э̄квагент]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Lat+PxDu3: [э̄кваге̄нн, э̄квагенн]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Abl+PxDu3: [э̄кваге̄нныл, э̄квагенныл]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Ins+PxDu3: [э̄кваге̄нтыл, э̄квагентыл]

     э̄ква+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: [э̄кванэ̄н, э̄кванэн]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [э̄кванэ̄нт, э̄кванэнт]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu3: [э̄кванэ̄нн, э̄кванэнн]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [э̄кванэ̄нныл, э̄кванэнныл]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu3: [э̄кванэ̄нтыл, э̄кванэнтыл]

     э̄ква+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: э̄квав
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: э̄квавт
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl1: э̄квавн
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: э̄квавныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: э̄квавтыл

     э̄ква+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: э̄квагув
     э̄ква+N+Du+Loc+PxPl1: э̄квагувт
     э̄ква+N+Du+Lat+PxPl1: э̄квагувн
     э̄ква+N+Du+Abl+PxPl1: э̄квагувныл
     э̄ква+N+Du+Ins+PxPl1: э̄квагувтыл

     э̄ква+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: э̄кванув
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: э̄кванувт
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl1: э̄кванувн
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: э̄кванувныл
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: э̄кванувтыл

     э̄ква+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: [э̄кван, э̄ква̄н]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [э̄квант, э̄ква̄нт]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl2: [э̄кванн, э̄ква̄нн]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [э̄кванныл, э̄ква̄нныл]
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: [э̄квантыл, э̄ква̄нтыл]

     э̄ква+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [э̄квагын, э̄квагы̄н]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Loc+PxPl2: [э̄квагынт, э̄квагынт]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Lat+PxPl2: [э̄квагынн, э̄квагынн]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Abl+PxPl2: [э̄квагынныл, э̄квагынныл]
     э̄ква+N+Du+Ins+PxPl2: [э̄квагынтыл, э̄квагынтыл]

     э̄ква+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: [э̄кванын, э̄кваны̄н, э̄кван]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [э̄кванынт, э̄кванынт, э̄квант]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl2: [э̄кванынн, э̄кванынн, э̄кванн]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [э̄кванынныл, э̄кванынныл, э̄кванныл]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: [э̄кванынтыл, э̄кванынтыл, э̄квантыл]

     э̄ква+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: э̄кваныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: э̄кванылт
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl3: э̄кванылн
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: э̄кванылныл
     э̄ква+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: э̄кванылтыл

     э̄ква+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: э̄кваганыл
     э̄ква+N+Du+Loc+PxPl3: э̄кваганылт
     э̄ква+N+Du+Lat+PxPl3: э̄кваганылн
     э̄ква+N+Du+Abl+PxPl3: э̄кваганылныл
     э̄ква+N+Du+Ins+PxPl3: э̄кваганылтыл

     э̄ква+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: [э̄кваныл, э̄квананыл]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [э̄кванылт, э̄квананылт]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl3: [э̄кванылн, э̄квананылн]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [э̄кванылныл, э̄квананылныл]
     э̄ква+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: [э̄кванылтыл, э̄квананылтыл]
